Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Contributions.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 130, SLA 2004 (HB 490), which relates to administrative hearing decisions on unemployment benefits, recommends changes to ensure that this chapter complies with federal law requirements, and makes a series of amendments in this article, see 2004 House Journal 2613 — 2614.

Collateral references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d, Unemployment Compensation, §§ 19-42.

81 C.J.S., Social Security and Public Welfare, §§ 192-210.

Liability of political party or its subdivision for contributions under unemployment compensation acts. 43 ALR3d 1351.

Sec. 23.20.165.
Payment of contributions.

Contributions with respect to wages for employment accrue and are payable by an employer for each calendar year in which the employer is subject to this chapter. Contributions become due and shall be paid by an employer to the department for the fund in accordance with regulations adopted by the department. An employer may not deduct contributions payable by the employer from the wages of an employee.

Contributions with respect to wages paid on or after January 1, 1955, for employment accrue and are payable by an individual who performs service in employment for each calendar year in which the services are subject to this chapter.

The contributions required from each individual, in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner, are payable, shall be deducted from the individual’s wages by the employer, and shall be held in trust by the employer for the commissioner until the employee contributions are required by regulation to be deposited with the commissioner. These funds are not subject to garnishment or attachment, and in the event of lien, judgment, or bankruptcy proceedings are not considered assets of the employer. An employer who fails to make the deductions from the wages of employees is liable to the commissioner for the payment of the required contributions. The contributions shall be collected from the employer in the manner provided for the collection of employer contributions.

If an employer converts to personal use or misappropriates funds so held in trust, the employer shall pay to the commissioner for deposit in the clearing account the amount converted or misappropriated, together with a penalty equal to five times that amount but not less than $25. In addition, if the conversion or misappropriation is wilful, the employer is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or by both.

An employer shall maintain a record of the amount deducted from the wages of each employee and shall furnish a statement of the deductions to each employee at the times and in the manner the department prescribes by regulation. A deduction may not be made from those wages paid to an employee during a calendar year which are in excess of the wages subject to contributions under AS

23.20.175

. If an employee in the employ of two or more employers earns wages in one calendar year totaling more than the wages subject to contributions or if an employer through error makes a deduction and erroneously pays contributions on wages of an employee in excess of the wages subject to contributions during a calendar year, the amount of deductions in excess of those required by this chapter shall be refunded to the employee by the department upon application for them in accordance with regulations adopted by the department. Application must be made during the calendar year after the calendar year in which the deductions are made.

History.

(§ 501 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 16 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 7 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 156 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 1973; am § 13 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 115 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.170.
Rate of contributions.

[Repealed, § 80 ch 9 SLA 1980.]

An employer who is not entitled to a rate determination under AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

because the employer is ineligible under AS

23.20.281

shall pay contributions at a rate equal to the average industry tax rate as determined by the commissioner. Assignment by the commissioner of employers to industrial classification, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be to the industry group code specified in the most current version of the North American Industry Classification System, United States, in accordance with established classification practices found in the most current version of the North American Industry Classification System manual prepared by the United States Office of Management and Budget.

The standard rate of contributions with respect to employment is 5.4 percent of wages paid. Reductions from the standard rate may only be made under this section and AS

23.20.280

—

23.20.310

.

History.

(§ 502 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 17 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 8 ch 60 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 43 SLA 1973; am §§ 14, 80 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.175.
Base of contributions.

[Repealed, § 30 ch 100 SLA 1989.]

[Repealed, § 30 ch 100 SLA 1989.]

For the purposes of AS

23.20.165

and

23.20.170

, wages do not include that part of remuneration paid during any calendar year to an individual by an employer or by a predecessor of the employer that exceeds 75 percent of the average annual wage, as defined in AS

23.20.520

, in Alaska for the preceding 12-month period ending June 30 computed to the nearest multiple of $100.

History.

(§ 503 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 18 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 9 ch 60 SLA 1960; am §§ 4, 5 ch 43 SLA 1973; am §§ 15, 16 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 30 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 32 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (c), deleted “after December 31, 1982” following “AS

23.20.165

and

23.20.170

”.

Sec. 23.20.180.
Records and analysis of experience with unemployment risk.

For each calendar year the department shall maintain separate accounts for each employer and claimant to obtain facts and studies upon which the legislature may determine whether an experience rating system should be adopted to require contributions from employers based upon their experience with unemployment risk, and, if so, the most equitable system for accomplishing this purpose consistent with the solvency of the unemployment compensation fund.

History.

(§ 504 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 19 ch 169 SLA 1957)

Sec. 23.20.185.
Interest on past due contributions.

If contributions are not paid on the date on which they are due, the amount remaining unpaid bears interest at the rate of 12 percent per year from the due date until payment plus accrued interest is received by the department. Interest collected under this section shall be deposited in the clearing account of the unemployment compensation fund.

Interest does not accrue on contributions from an estate in the hands of a receiver, executor, administrator, trustee in bankruptcy, common law assignee, or other liquidating officer after the date when the officer qualifies. However, contributions accruing with respect to employment of a person by the officer are due and draw interest in the same manner as contributions due from other employers.

Payments of contributions erroneously paid to an unemployment compensation fund of another state which should have been paid to this state and which are refunded by the other state and paid by the employer to this state shall be considered paid to this state at the date of payment of the other state.

Interest collected under this section shall periodically be transferred from the clearing account to the training and building fund.

History.

(§ 511 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 1969; am §§ 17, 18 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Sec. 23.20.190.
Penalty for failure to file reports.

An employer required to pay contributions under the provisions of AS

23.20.165

who fails to file a contribution report and wage schedule on the date it is due is subject to a penalty, to be assessed and collected in the same manner as contributions. If the report is filed within 30 days of the date it is due, the penalty is five percent of the contributions due. For each additional 30-day period or its fraction, the penalty is an additional five percent of the contributions due. However, the penalty may not exceed 25 percent of the contributions due in the aggregate and may not be less than $10 for each reporting period.

If a report is filed after it is due and it is shown to the satisfaction of the department that the failure to file was due to a reasonable cause, a penalty may not be assessed or collected.

Penalties collected under this section shall periodically be transferred from the clearing account to the training and building fund.

An employer who has elected to make reimbursement payments under AS

23.20.277

who fails to file a contribution report and wage schedule on the date it is due is subject to a penalty, to be assessed and collected in the same manner provided under this section for failure to file a contribution report and wage schedule. If the report is filed not later than 30 days after the date it is due, the penalty is one-tenth of one percent of the total wages paid for the quarter. For each additional 30-day period or its fraction, the penalty is an additional one-tenth of one percent of the total wages paid for the quarter. However, the penalty may not exceed one-half of one percent of the total wages paid for the quarter in the aggregate and may not be less than $10 for each reporting period.

The department may require an employer who fails to file a contribution report and wage schedule on the date it is due to file a monthly contribution report and wage schedule, with payment, not later than 30 days after the close of each month. A decision under this subsection shall be reviewed annually under regulations adopted by the department. The monthly contribution report and wage schedule is subject to the same interest and penalty provisions as provided in this section and in AS

23.20.185

.

History.

(§ 512 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 3 ch 106 SLA 1969; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.195.
Penalty for nonpayment of contribution.

If the contributions are unpaid after 30 days from the date of mailing or personal delivery of a written demand for payment, the department may assess and collect in the same manner as contributions a penalty equal to the greater of 10 percent of the contributions due or $10.

This penalty does not attach if within 30 days after mailing or personal delivery of the demand, arrangements for payments are made with the department, and payment is made in accordance with the arrangements.

Penalties collected under this section shall periodically be transferred from the clearing account to the training and building fund.

History.

(§ 513 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 4 ch 106 SLA 1969; am § 22 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 60, 61 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 100 SLA 1989)

Collateral references. —

Construction, application and effect, with respect to withholding, social security and unemployment compensation taxes, of statutes imposing penalties for tax evasion or default. 22 ALR3d 8.

Sec. 23.20.200.
Lien.

A claim for contributions, including interest and penalties, not paid when due is a lien in favor of the state against all the real and personal property of the employer.

The claim becomes a lien when the department records a notice of the lien with the recording officer of the recording district in which the property is located. The claim becomes a lien on a motor vehicle when the department files a notice of the lien in the office of the commissioner of administration. Filing or recording of the notice of lien is constructive notice of the lien against the property described in the notice to creditors of the owner, and to subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers.

[Repealed, § 80 ch 9 SLA 1980.]

The department may release a notice of lien by filing or recording a certificate of release in the manner prescribed for the filing or recording of a notice of lien. The department may not file or record a certificate of release until the amount of contributions, including interest, and penalties and costs, is paid, or until it receives assurance of payment which it considers adequate.

History.

(§ 514 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1967; am § 80 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 21 SLA 1985; am E.O. No. 99 § 19 (1997))

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsections (b) and (d) of this section in 1988 under § 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 23.20.205.
Notice of assessment, distraint, seizure, and sale.

If the department finds that a contribution including interest or penalty on the contribution is delinquent, the department may issue a notice of assessment specifying the amount due and may serve it on the delinquent employer. The notice must inform the employer of the department’s rights under (c) of this section. A peace officer or an authorized representative of the department may serve the notice personally or the department may mail the notice by certified or registered mail with return receipt requested.

If the notice is served by mail the notice must be deposited in the post office, addressed to the delinquent employer at the employer’s last address of record and the postage paid. The date of service is considered to be the day of delivery shown on the delivery receipt. However, if it appears the addressee is deliberately avoiding service, then the date of service is the day of mailing.

Unless an appeal is filed under AS

23.20.220

, if the amount assessed is not paid within 30 days after personal service or mailing of the notice as required by (a) of this section, the department may collect the amount stated in the assessment by the distraint, seizure, and sale of the property, goods, chattels, and effects of the delinquent employer. Goods and property exempt from execution under the laws of this state are exempt from distraint and sale under this section.

History.

(§ 515 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 20 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 23 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 6, 7 ch 100 SLA 1989)

Sec. 23.20.210.
Inventory and sale.

Upon making a distraint, the department shall seize the property and make an inventory of it. The department shall mail or personally deliver a copy of the inventory to the owner of the property, and shall specify the time and place when the property is to be sold. Notice specifying the property to be sold and the time and place of sale shall be posted in at least two public places in the recording district of the judicial district where the seizure is made. The time of sale may not be less than 20 nor more than 30 days from the date of posting the notice. The department may adjourn the sale from time to time but adjournment may not exceed 90 days in all. The department or its authorized representative shall conduct the sale. The property may be sold by parcel or lot at a public auction. The department may set a minimum price to include the expenses of making the levy and advertising the sale, and if the amount bid for the property at the sale is not equal to the minimum price fixed by the department, the department or its representative may declare the property purchased by the department for the minimum price. The department shall credit the delinquent account with the amount received at the sale for the property after defraying the costs of distraint, seizure, and sale. The department may sell the property acquired by it at public or private sale, and shall deposit the amount received in the unemployment compensation fund.

Upon sale of the property, the department shall issue a bill of sale or a deed to the purchaser. The bill of sale or the deed is prima facie evidence of the regularity of the proceedings of the department in making the sale. The bill of sale or the deed transfers to the purchaser all right, title, and interest of the delinquent employer in the property. The department shall first apply the proceeds of the sale toward reimbursement of the administration fund for the costs of distraint, seizure, and sale and the balance toward satisfaction of the delinquent account. The department shall refund the excess to the delinquent employer.

History.

(§ 516 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.215.
Notice and order to withhold and deliver.

The department may issue a notice and order to withhold and deliver property of any kind to a person or a political subdivision or department of the state when (1) the department has reason to believe that the person, political subdivision, or department possesses property which is due, owing, or the property of another person; and (2) notice and order of assessment has been served, at least 30 days before the issuance of the notice and order to withhold and deliver.

A peace officer or an authorized representative of the department may serve the notice to withhold and deliver. The person, political subdivision, or department upon whom service is made shall answer the notice within 10 days.

If the person, political subdivision, or department possesses property, credits, or money subject to the claim of the department, it shall deliver the property to the department immediately upon demand. The department shall hold the property in trust for application on the indebtedness involved or for return, without interest, in accordance with final determination of liability or nonliability, or, in the alternative, there shall be furnished a sufficient bond satisfactory to the department conditioned upon final determination of liability.

If a person fails to answer the order to withhold and deliver within the time prescribed, the superior court in the judicial district in which the order is served may enter a judgment by default against the person for the full amount claimed by the department in the notice to withhold and deliver, together with costs.

History.

(§ 516.1 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 21 ch 169 SLA 1957)

Sec. 23.20.220.
Appeals.

When a notice of assessment is delivered or mailed to a delinquent employer, the employer may within 30 days file an appeal in writing with the department, stating that the assessment is unjust or incorrect and requesting a hearing on it. The period for filing an appeal may be extended for a reasonable period for good cause. The appeal must set out the reasons the assessment is objected to and the amount of contributions that the employer admits is due, and must be accompanied by a bond or deposit of other security in the amount of the assessment to ensure collection. The department may waive the security requirement if the employer submits proof of solvency or reasonable assurance, as prescribed by regulations, that the contributions, interest, and penalties due are not in jeopardy. If the employer fails to provide the required security, the collection under AS

23.20.205(c)

is not stayed. The department shall adopt regulations for procedures for an appeal under this subsection.

If the appeal is accompanied by the required security or the department has waived the security requirement, filing an appeal on a disputed assessment with the department stays the sale provided for in AS

23.20.210

until a final decision on the assessment is made. However, the filing of an appeal does not affect the right of the department to perfect a lien as provided in AS

23.20.200

.

After granting the appellant reasonable opportunity for fair hearing, the department shall make a decision on the appeal. The department’s decision is final unless the appellant initiates a proceeding for judicial review in the manner provided by AS

23.20.445

.

When an order and notice of assessment becomes final, the superior court shall upon application of the department enter a judgment on the amount provided for in the order and notice of assessment. The judgment has the same effect as a judgment entered in a civil action.

History.

(§ 517 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 22 ch 169 SLA 1957; am § 24 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 100 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.225.
Adjustments and refunds.

Within two years after contributions or interest are erroneously paid, an employer who has paid such contributions or interest may file a written petition with the department for an adjustment of the payment as an offset against subsequent contribution payments, or for a refund of the payment when the adjustment as an offset cannot be made. If the department upon ex parte consideration determines that the contributions or interest were erroneously collected, it shall allow the employer to make an adjustment without interest. For like cause and within the same period, adjustment or refund may be made on the department’s own motion.

If the department finds upon ex parte consideration that it cannot determine that an adjustment or refund should be allowed, it shall deny the application and notify the employer in writing. Within 30 days after notification is mailed or delivered to the employer, whichever happens first, the employer may file a petition in writing with the department for a hearing. However, the right to a hearing does not apply when an assessment has been appealed from and has become final as provided in AS

23.20.220

. The petition shall set forth the reasons for granting a hearing and the amount which the petitioner believes should be adjusted or refunded. If a petition is not filed within the time prescribed, the determination of the department as stated in the notice is final.

After granting the petitioner reasonable opportunity for fair hearing, the department shall make a decision on the petition. The decision is final unless the petitioner initiates a proceeding for judicial review in the manner provided by AS

23.20.445

.

If not later than two years after the date of payment of interest or penalty an employer who has made such a payment determines that it was made erroneously, the employer may file a written petition with the department to have any subsequent amount of interest or penalties which has been, or might be, assessed against the employer, adjusted by the amount of the erroneous payment, or, if it appears that this adjustment would not be feasible within a reasonable time, the employer may request a refund of the erroneous payment. If the department upon ex parte consideration determines that the payment of interest or penalties, or any portion of it, was erroneous, it shall allow such an employer to make an adjustment in an amount equal to that erroneously paid, without interest, in connection with any subsequent interest or penalty payment which may be due, or, if this adjustment cannot be made, the department shall refund the amount, without interest, from the fund into which the payment was deposited or transferred. Refunds of interest and penalties erroneously collected may be made from the clearing account of the unemployment compensation fund or from the training and building fund if they were transferred to and deposited in that fund. Interest and penalty payments may not be refunded from the unemployment compensation fund. If an employer to whom a refund is due does not file a petition for the refund, the department may make an adjustment or refund of interest or penalties on its own initiative for like cause and subject to the same conditions.

The department shall adopt regulations providing for the disposition of excess contributions paid to the unemployment compensation fund under AS

23.20.130

after notice and opportunity for hearing.

History.

(§ 518 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am §§ 7, 8 ch 106 SLA 1969; am §§ 25, 26 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 130 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.230.
Arbitrary reports.

If an employing unit fails or neglects to make or file a report or return required by this chapter, the department, upon the basis of knowledge available to it, may arbitrarily make a report on behalf of the employing unit. The report is considered prima facie correct.

History.

(§ 519 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.235.
Jeopardy assessment.

If the department has reason to believe that an employer is insolvent or if the collection of contributions accrued will be jeopardized by delaying collection, the department may make an immediate assessment and may proceed to enforce collection immediately. However, interest does not begin to accrue upon the contribution until the date when the contribution normally becomes delinquent.

History.

(§ 520 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.240.
Collection of delinquent contributions.

If after notice an employer defaults in the payment of contribution or interest, the amount due may be collected by a person authorized by law and authorized by the department, by civil action in the name of the state, or by both methods. The department shall include in the amount due the fees or costs charged the department by the person for the collection of the delinquent amount. An employer who is liable shall pay the cost of the collection, including collection fees charged, and the costs of legal action.

A lien created by this chapter may be foreclosed by decree of the court in the action.

The court shall hear a civil action brought under this section to collect contributions or interest at the earliest possible date and the action is entitled to preference on the calendar of the court over all other civil actions except petitions for judicial review under this chapter and cases arising under the workers’ compensation laws of the state.

The courts in this state shall, in the manner provided in this section, entertain actions to collect contributions or interest for which liability has accrued under the employment security law of another state if the other state has a similar provision for actions to collect contributions due this state in its employment security law.

The attorney general may commence action in this state as agent for and on behalf of any other state to enforce judgments and liabilities for unemployment insurance contributions, penalties, interest, and benefit overpayments due such state which extends a like comity to this state if the requesting state agrees to pay the costs which may be assessed by the court against the plaintiff.

In this section, “employer” as defined in AS

23.20.520

also includes an officer or employee of a corporation, a member, manager, or employee of a limited liability company, or a member or employee of a partnership, including a limited partnership and a limited liability partnership, who, as an officer, employee, manager, or member, is under a duty to pay the contributions as required by (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 521 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1969; am § 27 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 12 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 130 SLA 2004)

Sec. 23.20.242.
Appeals by officer, manager, member, or employee.

The department shall permit each officer or employee of a corporation, member, manager, or employee of a limited liability company, or member or employee of a partnership, including a limited partnership and a limited liability partnership, who is required to pay the contributions and interest owed by the corporation, limited liability company, or partnership, including the limited partnership and the limited liability partnership, under AS

23.20.165

—

23.20.278

to appeal individually their duty to pay under those sections.

History.

(§ 13 ch 100 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 130 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.245.
Remedies cumulative.

Remedies given to the state under this chapter for the collection of contributions and interest are cumulative.
An action taken by the department may not be construed to be an election on the part of the state to pursue one remedy to the exclusion of another.

History.

(§ 522 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Collateral references. —

Repayment of unemployment compensation benefits erroneously paid. 90 ALR3d 987.

Sec. 23.20.247.
Employer’s security for delinquent contributions.

If the department determines that an employer has been delinquent in paying contributions owed to the fund for two or more calendar quarters, the department may require an employer to deposit and keep on deposit with the department a sum equal to the contributions payable to the fund for the four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the delinquency. If the employer does not have four completed payroll quarters immediately before the delinquency, the department shall estimate the employer’s annual contributions, based on contributions payable for the completed payroll quarters. In lieu of the deposit, the department may accept a bond or other security equal in value to the required deposit. The deposit, bond, or other security accepted by the department does not relieve the employer from making contributions to the fund or paying delinquent contributions, interest, and penalties as provided in this chapter. After notice and opportunity for hearing related to the application of the security, the department may immediately apply all or part of the deposit, bond, or other approved security to the employer’s delinquent contributions, interest, or penalties arising under this chapter.

Unless precluded by other law, the deposit, bond, or other security accepted by the department shall take priority over all other liens, claims, or encumbrances and shall be exempt from any process, attachment, garnishment, or execution.

If an employer ceases to be an employer subject to this chapter, the department shall, upon receipt of all payments due the fund, refund to the employer the deposits remaining to the employer’s credit and shall cancel any bond or other security accepted by the department under this section. The department may return, in whole or part, the deposit, bond, or other security accepted by the department under this section to the employer if the employer is current in paying contributions under this section for eight consecutive quarters.

History.

(§ 4 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Sec. 23.20.248.
Injunctive relief.

If an employer does not deposit and keep on deposit the security required by the department under AS

23.20.247

, the department, through the attorney general, may bring an action in superior court to enjoin the employer from operating any business as an employer within the state until

the employer is current on all final assessments, including interest and penalties made under this chapter; and

if requested, the employer deposits and keeps on deposit the security described in AS

23.20.247

to protect against future failures and to comply with this chapter.

The department may not seek injunctive relief under (a) of this section until the department has given the employer at least 30 days to comply with an order relating to security under AS

23.20.247

.

The department may not be required to post a bond for injunctive relief under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Sec. 23.20.250.
Lien upon distribution or assignment of assets.

If the assets of an employer are distributed under a court order, including a receivership, probate, legal dissolution, or a similar proceeding, or in the case of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, a composition, or a similar proceeding, contributions which are or which become due are a lien upon all the assets of the employer. The lien is prior to all other liens or claims except a prior tax lien, a lien filed or recorded under AS

23.20.200

, or a claim for remuneration of service of not more than $250 to each claimant, earned within six months before the starting of the proceeding.

The existence of a condition of insolvency or the institution of a judicial proceeding for legal dissolution or of a proceeding for distribution of assets causes the lien to attach without action on behalf of the department or the state.

In the event of an employer’s adjudication in bankruptcy, judicially-confirmed extension proposal, or composition, under 11 U.S.C. (Federal Bankruptcy Act), contributions that are or become due are entitled to the priority provided under that Act, as amended.

History.

(§ 523 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 28 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 under § 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 23.20.255.
Compromise of contributions.

The department may compromise a claim for contributions, interest, or penalties existing or arising under this chapter in any case where collection of the full claim would result in the insolvency of the employing unit or individual from whom the contributions, interest, or penalties are claimed.

If the department compromises a claim, there shall be filed with the department a statement of the amount of contributions, interest, and penalties imposed by law and claimed due, a complete record of the compromise agreement, and the amount actually paid in accordance with the terms of the compromise agreement.

A person who, in connection with a compromise or offer of compromise, wilfully conceals from an officer or employee of the state property belonging to an employing unit or individual liable for contributions, interest, or penalties, or receives, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement under oath relating to the financial condition of the employing unit or individual liable for contributions, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

If the department accepts a compromise, the compromise is final and conclusive at the time stated in it or at the time agreed to, and, except upon showing of fraud, malfeasance, misrepresentation of a material fact, or failure to meet the terms of the compromise, the case may not be reopened as to the matters agreed upon.

History.

(§ 524 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.260.
Liability of successor employer.

The contributions required by this chapter are a lien upon the property of an employer subject to the provisions of the chapter who sells out the business or stock of goods, who quits business, or whose property used or acquired in the business is sold under voluntary conveyance or under foreclosure, execution or attachment, distraint, or other judicial proceeding.

The employer shall file the reports which the department prescribes and pay the contributions required by this chapter with respect to wages payable for employment up to the date of the occurrence of each contingency.

The purchaser or successor in business shall withhold enough purchase money to cover the amount of contributions due and unpaid until the employer produces a receipt from the department showing that the contributions have been paid, or a certificate that no contributions are due. If the purchaser or successor fails to withhold purchase money as provided, and the contributions are not paid within 10 days, the purchaser or successor is personally liable for the payment of the contributions accrued and unpaid on account of the operation of the business by the former owner.

History.

(§ 525 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.265.
Liability of contractor and principal for contributions.

An employing unit which contracts with or has under it a contractor or subcontractor who is an employer under the provisions of this chapter may not make a payment to the contractor or subcontractor for a debt due until the contractor or subcontractor has paid or furnished a sufficient bond acceptable to the department for payment of contributions, including penalty and interest, due or to become due for personal services which have been performed by individuals for the contractor or subcontractor arising during the course of the employment of the contractor or subcontractor by the employing unit.

Failure to comply with this section makes the employing unit directly liable for the contributions and interest and the department has the remedies of collection against the employing unit under this chapter as though the services in question were performed directly for the employing unit.

Upon request, the department may notify an employing unit of its contractor’s or subcontractor’s liability for contributions, interest, and penalties under this chapter to allow the employing unit to comply with this section.

History.

(§ 526 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Employment Security Division may assess the prime contractor for contributions and interest owing by a bankrupt subcontractor, if the prime contractor has not complied with the requirements of this section. October 11, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor may hold an employee-leasing company and the actual business liable for Employment Security Division taxes. July 16, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.20.270.
Limitation of actions and uncollectible accounts.

The department shall begin action for the collection of contributions, including interest and penalties, imposed by this chapter by assessment or suit within five years after a return is filed. A proceeding for the collection of these amounts may not be begun after the expiration of this period. In case of a false or fraudulent return with intent to evade contributions, or in the event of a failure to file a return, the contributions may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for the collection of the contributions may be begun, at any time.

The department may charge off as uncollectible and no longer an asset of the unemployment compensation fund a delinquent contribution after five years from the date of delinquency, if the department is satisfied that there are no available means by which the contribution may be collected.

History.

(§ 527 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 23 ch 169 SLA 1957)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A notice of assessment filed within the five-year period stops the running of the statute. November 22, 1966 Op. Att’y Gen., aff’d February 29, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.20.275.
Service of process.

Process for assessment and collection of contributions may be served inside and outside the state.
In addition to any other method of service provided for in this chapter, service may be made by certified or registered mail.

History.

(§ 528 ch 5 ESLA 1955, added by § 10 ch 60 SLA 1960)